South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  County and municipal law enforcement agencies in this State are required to participate in at least one Section 287(g) program. SECTION 2.  Once a county or municipal law enforcement agency is made aware of illegal operations to bring undocumented individuals to this State, the law enforcement agency must cooperate fully with the U.S. Attorney's Office to commence RICO-based seizures to seize all assets used in the efforts to import undocumented individuals to the United States of America. SECTION 3.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----